dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="pegiat-pegiat__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiat-pegiatnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiat__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiatnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataan-pemerataan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataan-pemerataannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulan-pembetulan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulan-pembetulannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong-pembohong__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong-pembohongnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohongnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan-perkhidmatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan-perkhidmatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak-perusak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak-perusaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="besaran-besaran__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="besaran__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="terbaik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ingin__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengemudiankan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengemudiankannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berlangsung__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dikemudiankan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dikemudiankannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengapa__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan-keesokan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan-keesokannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="namun__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dan__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jika__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ini__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sebuah__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aduh__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="ij"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memberhentikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memberhentikannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ong"><i>ong</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="langsung"><p><l>berlangsung</l><r>langsung</r></p><par n="berlangsung__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sahaja"><p><l>bersahaja</l><r>sahaja</r></p><par n="berlangsung__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kecil"><p><l>kecil-kecilan</l><r>kecil</r></p><par n="besaran-besaran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sakit"><p><l>sakit-sakitan</l><r>sakit</r></p><par n="besaran-besaran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lapang"><p><l>lapangan</l><r>lapang</r></p><par n="besaran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sasar"><p><l>sasaran</l><r>sasar</r></p><par n="besaran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sementara"><i>sementara</i><par n="dan__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="harus"><p><l>diharuskan</l><r>harus</r></p><par n="dikemudiankan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="langsung"><p><l>dilangsungkan</l><r>langsung</r></p><par n="dikemudiankan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dapat"><p><l>didapatkannya</l><r>dapat</r></p><par n="dikemudiankannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ingin"><p><l>diinginkannya</l><r>ingin</r></p><par n="dikemudiankannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lama-lama"><i>lama-lama</i><par n="ingin__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sekenyangnya"><i>sekenyangnya</i><par n="ingin__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="itu"><i>itu</i><par n="ini__det"/></e>
    <e lm="seandainya"><i>seandainya</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kurang"><p><l>kekurangan</l><r>kurang</r></p><par n="keesokan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mau"><p><l>kemauan</l><r>mau</r></p><par n="keesokan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mungkin"><p><l>kemungkinannya</l><r>mungkin</r></p><par n="keesokannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>memberlakukan</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="memberhentikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pandang"><p><l>memandang</l><r>pandang</r></p><par n="mengajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="di mana"><i>di<b/>mana</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mengapa"><i>mengapa</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="harus"><p><l>mengharuskan</l><r>harus</r></p><par n="mengemudiankan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="langsung"><p><l>melangsungkan</l><r>langsung</r></p><par n="mengemudiankan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ingin"><p><l>menginginkannya</l><r>ingin</r></p><par n="mengemudiankannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mungkin"><p><l>memungkinkannya</l><r>mungkin</r></p><par n="mengemudiankannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jadi"><i>jadi</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meskipun demikian"><i>meskipun<b/>demikian</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="muda"><p><l>pemuda-pemuda</l><r>muda</r></p><par n="pegiat-pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lawak"><p><l>pelawak</l><r>lawak</r></p><par n="pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malu"><p><l>pemalu</l><r>malu</r></p><par n="pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cerna"><p><l>pencernaan</l><r>cerna</r></p><par n="pembetulan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penuh"><p><l>pemenuhan</l><r>penuh</r></p><par n="pembetulan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jelas"><p><l>penjelasannya</l><r>jelas</r></p><par n="pembetulannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teliti"><p><l>penelitiannya</l><r>teliti</r></p><par n="pembetulannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dingin"><p><l>pendingin</l><r>dingin</r></p><par n="pembohong__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="padam"><p><l>pemadam</l><r>padam</r></p><par n="pembohong__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gemar"><p><l>penggemarnya</l><r>gemar</r></p><par n="pembohongnya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rata"><p><l>pemerataan</l><r>rata</r></p><par n="pemerataan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="raya"><p><l>perayaan-perayaan</l><r>raya</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan-perkhidmatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="luas"><p><l>perluasan</l><r>luas</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rusak"><p><l>perusakan</l><r>rusak</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>pertahanannya</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="perkhidmatannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="retas"><p><l>peretas</l><r>retas</r></p><par n="perusak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rusak"><p><l>perusak</l><r>rusak</r></p><par n="perusak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="seorang"><i>seorang</i><par n="sebuah__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hebat"><p><l>terhebat</l><r>hebat</r></p><par n="terbaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mahal"><p><l>termahal</l><r>mahal</r></p><par n="terbaik__adj"/></e>
